apertium-ido.ido.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o&lt;s n=&quot;n&quot;/&gt;&lt;s n=&quot;sg&quot;/&gt;&lt;s n=&quot;nom&quot;/&gt;</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>o&lt;s n=&quot;n&quot;/&gt;&lt;s n=&quot;pl&quot;/&gt;&lt;s n=&quot;nom&quot;/&gt;</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>
            a
            <s n="adj"/>
            <s n="sg"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>
            e
            <s n="adv"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>
            ar
            <s n="vblex"/>
            <s n="inf"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>
            ar
            <s n="vblex"/>
            <s n="pri"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="adv"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="pr"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="cnjcoo"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="cnjsub"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="prn"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="n"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="adj"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex"/>
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="Japonia">
      <i>Japoni</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Venezuela">
      <i>Venezuel</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="atika">
      <i>atik</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="chanjema">
      <i>chanj</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="drola">
      <i>drol</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="fetida">
      <i>fetid</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="humida">
      <i>humid</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kauchuka">
      <i>kauchuk</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="ligna">
      <i>lign</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="negativa">
      <i>negativ</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="olima">
      <i>olim</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="populara">
      <i>popular</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="singla">
      <i>singl</i>
      <par n="a__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="altramaniere">
      <i>altra|altr.a</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="atencoze">
      <i>atenc</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="bronze">
      <i>bronz</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="celeme">
      <i>cel</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="drastike">
      <i>drastik</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="fortune">
      <i>fortun</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="ibe">
      <i>ib</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="komprenende">
      <i>kompren</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="mine">
      <i>min</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="oblique">
      <i>obliqu</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="precipue">
      <i>precipu</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="sekrete">
      <i>sekret</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="tote">
      <i>tot</i>
      <par n="e__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="amblo">
      <i>ambl</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="axoloto">
      <i>axolot</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="bureto">
      <i>buret</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="demono">
      <i>demon</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="endemio">
      <i>endemi</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="flugoroto">
      <i>flugo|flug(.o)</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="gulfo">
      <i>gulf</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kaktuso">
      <i>kaktus</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kurato">
      <i>kurat</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="nepotismo">
      <i>nepotism</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="profesiono">
      <i>profesion</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="skultisto">
      <i>skult</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="voco">
      <i>voc</i>
      <par n="o__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="asimilar">
      <i>asimil</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="bruisigar">
      <i>bruis</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="disipar">
      <i>disip</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="estanchar">
      <i>estanch</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="frustrar">
      <i>frustr</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="insistar">
      <i>insist</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="komputar">
      <i>komput</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kunesar">
      <i>kun</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="natar">
      <i>nat</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="plubonigar">
      <i>plu.</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="registragar">
      <i>registr</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="satisfacar">
      <i>satisfac</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="subisar">
      <i>subis</i>
      <par n="ar__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="12ma">
      <i>12ma</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="16ma">
      <i>16ma</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="1ma">
      <i>1ma</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="23ma">
      <i>23ma</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="27ma">
      <i>27ma</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="30ma">
      <i>30ma</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="5ma">
      <i>5ma</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="9ma">
      <i>9ma</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Europana">
      <i>Europana</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Kotava">
      <i>Kotava</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="da">
      <i>da</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="ja">
      <i>ja</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="triesma">
      <i>triesma</i>
      <par n="__adj"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Nobel">
      <i>Nobel</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Reji">
      <i>Reji</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Unionita Nacioni">
      <i>Unionita Nacioni</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="ankore">
      <i>ankore</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="cirke">
      <i>cirke</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="duadek">
      <i>duadek</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="forsan">
      <i>forsan</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="heredale">
      <i>heredale</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="kin">
      <i>kin</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="nek">
      <i>nek</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="qui">
      <i>qui</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="tamen">
      <i>tamen</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="vorti">
      <i>vorti</i>
      <par n="__adv"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="nam">
      <i>nam</i>
      <par n="__cnjcoo"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="dum">
      <i>dum</i>
      <par n="__cnjsub"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="quankam">
      <i>quankam</i>
      <par n="__cnjsub"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Chili">
      <i>Chili</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Falklandi">
      <i>Falklandi</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Ioannes">
      <i>Ioannes</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Kroniki">
      <i>Kroniki</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Nepal">
      <i>Nepal</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Reykjavik">
      <i>Reykjavik</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Volapük">
      <i>Volapük</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="angelus">
      <i>angelus</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="dami">
      <i>dami</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="ego">
      <i>ego</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="lavomashino">
      <i>lavomashino</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="muziko">
      <i>muziko</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="pro to">
      <i>pro to</i>
      <par n="__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="ad">
      <i>ad</i>
      <par n="__pr"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="en">
      <i>en</i>
      <par n="__pr"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="inter">
      <i>inter</i>
      <par n="__pr"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="til">
      <i>til</i>
      <par n="__pr"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Esdras">
      <i>Esdras</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Isaias">
      <i>Isaias</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Lukas">
      <i>Lukas</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Mikaeas">
      <i>Mikaeas</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="Zakarias">
      <i>Zakarias</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="depos">
      <i>depos</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="havis">
      <i>havis</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="konsputar">
      <i>konsputar</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="mashinoskribar">
      <i>mashinoskribar</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="pos">
      <i>pos</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="quale tu standas">
      <i>quale tu standas</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="vizitis">
      <i>vizitis</i>
      <par n="__vblex"/>
    </e>
